Louisiana, session 2026, HB327.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2.2. Illegal acts; carbon dioxide sequestration
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, carbon dioxide
sequestration beneath private property without the property owner's consent is
illegal. However, this Section shall not apply if, after a reasonable search and good
faith effort by the storage facility owner or operator, the property owner cannot be
located.